Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1110
Recognizance forfeited; satisfaction; forfeiture set aside or remitted; exoneration of surety.

When the conditions of the recognizance have been satisfied or the forfeiture thereof has been set aside or remitted, the court shall exonerate the obligors and release any bail. A surety may be exonerated by a deposit of cash in the amount of the recognizance or by a timely surrender of the defendant into custody.

Laws 1953, c. 88, § 5, p. 260.

Disposition of funds of forfeited recognizance, see section 29-2708.